Wisconsin, session 2025, AB933.
do enact as follows:Law Revision Committee prefatory note: This bill is a remedial legislation proposal, requested by the Department of Public Instruction and introduced by the Law Revision Committee under s. 13.83 (1) (c) 4. and 5., stats. After careful consideration of the various provisions of the bill, the Law Revision Committee has determined that this bill makes minor substantive changes in the statutes, and that these changes are desirable as a matter of public policy.AB933,11Section 1. 115.42 (1) (a) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB933,2,42115.42 (1) (a) 1. The person is certified by the National Board for Professional 3Teaching Standards or licensed by the department as a master educator under s. PI 434.19 34.042, Wis. Adm. Code.Note: This section corrects a reference to a chapter of the administrative code that was broken when that chapter was repealed and recreated in 2018.AB933,25Section 2. 118.19 (7) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB933,2,116118.19 (7) (a) No certificate or license to teach industrial arts subjects may be 7issued unless the applicant has had 3 years of practical experience beyond 8apprenticeship or 4 years of institutional training in such subjects. For purposes of 9salary schedules and promotion, any person teaching an industrial arts subject on 10January 1, 1936, who had 5 years of practical or teaching experience in such subject 11shall be deemed to have the equivalent of a bachelor’s degree.Note: This section repeals an obsolete provision that applied only to a person who had five years of practical or teaching experience and was teaching an industrial arts subject on January 1, 1936.AB933,312Section 3. 118.19 (16) of the statutes is amended to read:AB933,3,613118.19 (16) The department shall ensure that teaching experience gained 1while a person held an emergency permit a license issued by the department under 2s. PI 34.21 (2) 34.028, Wis. Adm. Code, counts toward fulfillment of the teaching 3experience requirement under s. PI 34.040 (2) (d), Wis. Adm. Code, for a license 4based on experience under s. PI 34.195 (2), Wis. Adm. Code, or the teaching 5experience requirement under s. PI 34.065 (4), Wis. Adm. Code, for a license in a 6school administrator category under s. PI 34.32, Wis. Adm. Code.AB933,47Section 4. 118.193 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB933,3,108118.193 (1) In this section, an “administrator license” means a license in a 9school administrator category under s. PI 34.32 subch. VIII of ch. PI 34, Wis. Adm. 10Code.AB933,511Section 5. 118.193 (4) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB933,3,1612118.193 (4) (b) The department shall determine the school administrator 13category under s. PI 34.32 subch. VIII of ch. PI 34, Wis. Adm. Code, for a license 14issued under sub. (3) and the grades to which the license applies based on the 15individual’s license granted by another state and the individual’s experience as an 16administrator.Note: Sections 3 to 5 correct references to a chapter of the administrative code that were broken when that chapter was repealed and recreated in 2018.AB933,3,1717